Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 76.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-1428
Law Enforcement
Improvement Fund; created; use; investment.

The
Law Enforcement Improvement Fund is created and shall be maintained by the
State Treasurer as a cash fund. The fund shall consist of revenue credited
pursuant to section 81-1429 and investment income. The fund shall be used
for payment of administrative and operations expenses of the Nebraska Law
Enforcement Training Center and such other expenses as budgeted by the Legislature
for the improvement of law enforcement,
except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. The Law
Enforcement Improvement Fund shall be administered by the director.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1971, LB 929, § 9;

Laws 1972, LB 1485, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 994, § 10;

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 8;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 76.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.